Utah statutes.
30-3-7.   When decree becomes absolute.

(1)  The decree of divorce becomes absolute:

(a)  on the date it is signed by the court and entered by the clerk in the register of actions if both the parties who have a child or children have completed attendance at the mandatory course for divorcing parents as provided in Section 30-3-11.3 except if the court waives the requirement, on its own motion or on the motion of one of the parties, upon determination that course attendance and completion are not necessary, appropriate, feasible, or in the best interest of the parties;

(b)  at the expiration of a period of time the court may specifically designate, unless an appeal or other proceedings for review are pending; or

(c)  when the court, before the decree becomes absolute, for sufficient cause otherwise orders.

(2)  The court, upon application or on its own motion for good cause shown, may waive, alter, or extend a designated period of time before the decree becomes absolute, but not to exceed six months from the signing and entry of the decree.

